Oklahoma, session 2025, SB554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-190, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 122, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 6-190), is amended to read as follows:


Section 6-190. A. The board of education of each school


district shall employ and contract in writing, as required in


Section 6-101 of this title, only with persons certified to teach by


the State Board of Education in accordance with the Oklahoma Teacher



Req. No. 251 Page 1


Preparation Act, except as otherwise provided for by Section 6-101


of this title and by other law.


B. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to any person


who:


1. Has successfully completed the teacher education program


required by the Commission for Educational Quality and


Accountability;


2. Has graduated from an accredited institution of higher


education that has approval or accreditation for teacher education;


3. Has met all other requirements as may be established by the


Board;


4. Has made the necessary application and paid the competency


examination fee in an amount and as prescribed by the Commission;


5. Has successfully completed the competency examination


required in Section 6-187 of this title; and


6. Beginning November 1, 2001, has on file with the Board a


current Oklahoma criminal history record from the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation as well as a national criminal history


record check as defined in Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. Upon receipt of the Oklahoma criminal history record, the


Board may issue a temporary certificate which shall be effective


until receipt of the national fingerprint-based criminal history


record. The person applying for a certificate shall be responsible


for the cost of the criminal history records.

Req. No. 251 Page 2


C. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to any person


who:


1. Holds an out-of-state certificate and meets the requirements


set forth in subsection G of this section;


2. Holds certification from the National Board for Professional


Teaching Standards;


3. Holds an out-of-country certificate and meets the


requirements set forth in subsection F of this section; or


4. Has successfully completed a competency examination used in


the majority of other states or comparable customized exam and meets


the requirements set forth in subsection H of this section.


D. Beginning July 1, 2004, any person applying for initial


Oklahoma certification shall have on file with the Board a current


Oklahoma criminal history record from the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation as well as a national criminal history record check as


defined in Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Upon


receipt of the Oklahoma criminal history record, the Board may issue


a temporary certificate which shall be effective until receipt of


the national fingerprint-based criminal history record. The person


applying for a certificate shall be responsible for the cost of the


criminal history records.


E. Any person holding a valid certificate, issued prior to


January 1, 1997, shall be a certified teacher for purposes of the


Oklahoma Teacher Preparation Act, subject to any professional

Req. No. 251 Page 3


development requirements prescribed by the Oklahoma Teacher


Preparation Act or by the State Board of Education.


F. 1. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to a person


who holds a valid out-of-country certificate and meets any


requirements established by the Board. The certificate to teach


shall only be for those subject areas and grade levels most closely


aligned to the subject areas and grade levels recognized on the out-


of-country certificate.


2. A person who meets the requirements of paragraph 1 of this


subsection shall not be required to take any competency examinations


in those subject areas and grade levels most closely aligned to the


subject areas and grade levels recognized on the out-of-country


certificate.


3. A person who meets the requirements of paragraph 1 of this


subsection shall have on file with the Board a current Oklahoma


criminal history record check from the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation as well as a national criminal history record check as


defined in Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Upon


receipt of the Oklahoma criminal history record check, the Board may


issue a temporary certificate which shall be effective until receipt


of the national fingerprint-based criminal history record check.


The person applying for a certificate shall be responsible for the


cost of the criminal history record checks.



Req. No. 251 Page 4


4. The Board shall promulgate rules establishing a process by


which out-of-country certificates will be reviewed and evaluated for


purposes of awarding a certificate to teach pursuant to this


subsection.


G. 1. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to a person


who holds a valid out-of-state certificate. The certificate to


teach shall only be for those subject areas and grade levels most


closely aligned to the subject areas and grade levels recognized on


the out-of-state certificate.


2. A person who meets the requirements of paragraph 1 of this


subsection shall not be required to take any competency examinations


in those subject areas and grade levels most closely aligned to the


subject areas and grade levels recognized on the out-of-state


certificate.


3. A person who meets the requirements of this subsection shall


have on file with the Board a current Oklahoma criminal history


record check from the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation as well


as a national criminal history record check as defined in Section


150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Upon receipt of the


Oklahoma criminal history record check, the Board may issue a


temporary certificate which shall be effective until receipt of the


national fingerprint-based criminal history record check. The


person applying for a certificate shall be responsible for the cost


of the criminal history record checks.

Req. No. 251 Page 5


H. 1. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to a person


who has successfully completed a competency exam used in a majority


of the other states. The certificate to teach shall only be for


those subject areas and grade levels that correspond with a


certification area used in Oklahoma.


2. A person who meets the requirements of paragraph 1 of this


subsection shall have on file with the Board a current Oklahoma


criminal history record check from the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation as well as a national criminal history record check as


defined in Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Upon


receipt of the Oklahoma criminal history record check, the Board may


issue a temporary certificate which shall be effective until receipt


of the national fingerprint-based criminal history record check.


The person applying for a certificate shall be responsible for the


cost of the criminal history record checks.


I. 1. The Board may establish new levels of teacher


certificates: advanced, lead, and master. Each level shall have a


salary increase requirement stipend paid with state dollars from the


lottery funds as provided in Section 713 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma


Statutes. The advanced certificate shall include a salary increase


stipend of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00), the lead certificate


shall include a salary increase stipend of Five Thousand Dollars


($5,000.00), and the master certificate shall include a salary


increase stipend of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).

Req. No. 251 Page 6


2. A teacher who works in a school with an enrollment of forty


percent (40%) or more of students who are economically disadvantaged


as defined in Section 18-109.5 of this title or a school district


with an enrollment of fewer than one thousand students shall be paid


a one-time award in addition to the salary increases stipends


provided in paragraph 1 of this subsection:


a. One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) for an


advanced certificate,


b. Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for a


lead certificate, and


c. Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for a master


certificate.


3. School districts may identify and designate the highest


quality teachers for advanced, lead, and master certificates.


Participating districts shall submit designation plans to the State


Department of Education for evaluation and approval. Districts


shall have local control and flexibility in determining how to


evaluate teachers and assign designations, but, at a minimum, the


designation system shall include a teacher observation, out-of-


classroom time, and a student performance component.


a. Teacher observation shall be based on the district’s


selected Oklahoma Teacher and Leader Effectiveness


Evaluation System (TLE) evaluation tool or an


alternate method of evaluation; provided, the method

Req. No. 251 Page 7


is evidenced-based. Alternate methods of evaluation


shall not replace the requirements of Section 6-101.16


of this title.


b. Each school district that elects to participate in


assigning advanced, lead, and master teacher


certificates shall include an out-of-classroom


component for its assigned teachers to allow for


professional growth opportunities while staying in the


classroom. How out-of-classroom time is allotted and


managed shall be determined by the school district and


submitted as part of its designation plan to the State


Department of Education for review and approval.


c. Student performance measures may be determined by the


district and may include, but shall not be limited to,


pre- and post-tests, summative or formative, and


portfolios. The school district application shall


show evidence of validity and reliability of the


measures.


Districts may use additional factors in determining which


teachers are eligible to receive a designation, such as student


surveys, teacher leadership responsibilities, teacher mentorship


responsibilities, family surveys, demonstration of district core


values, teacher peer surveys, and contributions to the broader


school community. No more than ten percent (10%) of each school

Req. No. 251 Page 8


district’s teachers may be designated as an advanced, lead, or


master teacher in any given school year.


4. If a school district chooses to participate in this program,


the state shall provide the increased salary stipend amounts


indicated for advanced, lead, and master certificates in paragraph 1


of this subsection above the base pay.


5. School districts that designate teachers for advanced, lead,


and master certificates do not have to participate in annual TLE


evaluations for the designated teachers.


6. School districts may designate teachers for advanced, lead,


or master certificates two times per year, once prior to the


beginning of the school year, and once prior to the beginning of the


second semester. Teachers statewide who receive these designations


shall be placed in professional development cohorts and provided


additional training opportunities from the State Department of


Education.


7. After initial approval by the State Department of Education,


the Department shall review and validate each participating school


district’s teacher evaluation system biennially.


8. The State Department of Education shall annually report the


school districts participating in the program, the number of


advanced, lead, and master certificates awarded, and the total


amount in state funding that was distributed to teachers from the



Req. No. 251 Page 9


Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund created in Section 6-190.2 of


this title.


9. The selection criteria; designation of advanced, lead, or


master teachers; and any associated salary increases stipend amounts


shall not be subject to collective bargaining.


10. Stipends provided pursuant to this subsection shall not be


included in the calculation of the teacher’s salary for purposes of


meeting the district or statutory minimum salary schedule or for


purposes of calculating Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma


contributions or benefits.


J. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to implement


a renewal schedule and associated fees for advanced, lead, and


master teaching certificates. The rules shall allow a teacher that


no longer meets the requirements of an advanced, lead, or master


teaching certificate to make application for the standard teaching


certificate.


K. The terms of the contracts issued to those holding advanced,


lead, and master teaching certificates shall include the following:


1. Advanced: an additional five (5) days to be used to


strengthen instructional leadership. A person with an advanced


teaching certificate shall receive an annual salary increase stipend


of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) or the district’s daily rate


of pay, whichever is higher, in addition to the salary for which the


teacher qualifies pursuant to Section 18-114.15 of this title. This

Req. No. 251 Page 10


increase stipend shall be funded by state dollars from the lottery


funds as provided in Section 713 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma


Statutes and shall be paid as regular annual compensation directly


to teachers through school districts;


2. Lead: an additional ten (10) days to be used to strengthen


instructional leadership. A person with a lead teaching certificate


shall receive an annual salary increase stipend of Five Thousand


Dollars ($5,000.00) or the district’s daily rate of pay, whichever


is higher, in addition to the salary for which the teacher qualifies


pursuant to Section 18-114.15 of this title. This increase stipend


shall be funded by state dollars from the lottery funds as provided


in Section 713 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes and shall be


paid as regular annual compensation directly to teachers through


school districts; and


3. Master: an additional fifteen (15) days to be used to


strengthen leadership. A person with a master teaching certificate


shall receive an annual salary increase stipend of Ten Thousand


Dollars ($10,000.00) or the district’s daily rate of pay, whichever


is higher, in addition to the salary for which the teacher qualifies


pursuant to Section 18-114.15 of this title. This increase stipend


shall be funded by state dollars from the lottery funds as provided


in Section 713 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes and shall be


paid as regular annual compensation directly to teachers through


school districts.

Req. No. 251 Page 11


If a person with an advanced, lead, or master teaching


certificate changes school districts during the life of the


certificate, the terms of the contracts required in this subsection


shall be subject to approval by the new employing school district.


L. Beginning in the 2022-2023 school year, the Department shall


make the teaching certificates provided for in this section


available for any person who has received a recommendation from his


or her school district and who meets the eligibility criteria as


outlined in each school district’s teacher evaluation system


provided for in subsection I of this section.


M. The funding necessary for the administration of this section


shall be provided from the Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund


created in Section 6-190.2 of this title. If funding for the


administration of the teaching certificates listed in subsection I


is not available, the Department shall not be required to fulfill


the requirements listed in subsections I, K, and L of this section.


N. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of Section 6-180 et seq. of this title.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 359, O.S.L.


2022, as amended by Section 2, Chapter 122, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S.


Supp. 2024, Section 6-190.2), is amended to read as follows:


Section 6-190.2. A. There is hereby created in the State


Treasury a revolving fund for the State Department of Education to


be designated the “Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund”. The

Req. No. 251 Page 12


revolving fund shall be a continuing fund, without legislative


appropriation, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall be


under the control and management of the State Department of


Education. Expenditures from the Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund


shall be budgeted and expended as provided for in subsection B of


this section.


B. The State Department of Education shall utilize the funds


for the program outlined in Section 6-190 of this title. Funding


shall be allocated to school districts to provide the increased


salary stipend amounts indicated for advanced, lead, and master


certificates as provided for in subsection I of Section 6-190 of


this title on a first-come, first-served basis until the cash is


exhausted for the school year.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-251 EB 1/19/2025 5:38:38 AM









Req. No. 251 Page 13